District of Columbia statutes.
8-416

Cooperative agreements.

The Mayor may cooperate, receive grants-in-aid, and enter into agreements with any agency of the Federal Government or the District, or with any agency of a state, to obtain assistance in the implementation of this chapter, or in the enforcement of the FIFRA.

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 17, 24 DCR 6867

History

1981 Ed., § 6-751.16.

Prior Codifications